Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2745
Application of sections.

Sections 30-2734 to 30-2745 apply to registrations of securities in beneficiary form made before, on, or after September 9, 1993, by decedents dying on or after such date.

Laws 1993, LB 250, § 31.